California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(1) This subdivision does not apply to a person aboard a personal watercraft or a person being towed behind a vessel on water skis, if that person is a performer engaged in a professional exhibition, or preparing to participate or participating with authorization pursuant to a United States Coast Guard permit or other permit granted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 268 in an official regatta, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition.

(2) In lieu of wearing a United States Coast Guard-approved wearable personal flotation device as described in this subdivision, a person engaged in slalom skiing on a marked course or a person engaged in barefoot, jump, or trick waterskiing may elect to wear a wetsuit designed for the activity and labeled by the manufacturer as a water ski wetsuit. A United States Coast Guard-approved personal flotation device as
 described in this subdivision shall be carried in the tow vessel for each skier electing to wear a water ski wetsuit pursuant to this paragraph.

(e) The requirements set forth in subdivisions (a) and (d) do not apply to a person 13 years of age or older operating a
 recreational vessel if the vessel is engaged in an emergency rescue situation.

(f) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a person operating a “passenger vessel,” as defined in Section 2101(31) of Title 46 of the United States Code or a “small passenger vessel,” as defined in Section
 2101(47) of Title 46 of the United States Code.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Enclosed cabin” means a space on board a vessel that is surrounded by bulkheads or canvas, and covered by a roof.

(2) “Underway” means all times except when the motorboat, sailboat, or vessel is anchored, moored, or aground.

(h) A violation of this section is an infraction punishable as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 668.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 16.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

658.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no person under 16 years of age shall operate a vessel powered by a motor of greater than 15 horsepower, except for a vessel that does not exceed 30 feet in length and is designed to use wind as its principal source of propulsion, or a dinghy used directly between a moored vessel and the shoreline or between a moored vessel and another moored vessel.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), no person 12, 13, 14, or 15 years of age shall operate a vessel powered by a motor of greater than 15 horsepower, or a vessel that exceeds 30 feet in length and is designed to use wind as its principal source of propulsion, unless the person is accompanied in the vessel by a person who is at least 18 years of age and who is attentive and supervising the operation of the vessel.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to any of the following:

(1) A person who operates a vessel as a performer in a professional exhibition.

(2) A person engaged in an organized regatta, vessel race, or water ski race.

(3) A person engaged in a marine event authorized pursuant to Section 268.

(d) Any person who violates this section, and any person who permits any other person under 16 years of age to operate a vessel in violation of this section, is guilty of an infraction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

658.7.

(a) Failure of the operator of a vessel involved in towing a skier to display or cause to be displayed a ski flag, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 7009 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, to indicate any of the following conditions, is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding fifteen dollars ($15):

(1) A downed skier.

(2) A skier in the water preparing to ski.

(3) A ski line extended from the vessel.

(4) A ski in the water in the vicinity of the vessel.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition or a person engaged in a regatta, vessel or water ski race or competition, or other marine event authorized pursuant to Section 268.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 751, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

659.

The department may make rules and regulations for the uniform navigational marking of the waters of this state. Such rules and regulations shall not be in conflict with markings prescribed by the United States Coast Guard. No city, county, or person shall mark the waters of this state in any manner in conflict with the markings prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

660.

(a) Any ordinance, law, regulation, or rule relating to vessels, which is adopted pursuant to provisions of law other than this chapter by any entity other than the department, including, but not limited to, any county, city, port authority, district, or any state agency other than the department, shall, notwithstanding any other provision of law, pertain only to time-of-day restrictions, speed zones, special-use areas, and sanitation and pollution control, and the measure shall not conflict with this chapter or the regulations adopted by the department. Except as provided in subdivision (c), any measure relating to boats or vessels adopted by any governmental entity other than the department shall be submitted to the department prior to adoption and at least 30 days prior to the effective date thereof.

(b) The department may make special rules and regulations governing the use of boats or vessels on any body of water within the territorial limits of two or more counties, cities, or other political subdivisions if no special rules or regulations exist or if the department determines that the local laws regulating the use of boats or vessels on that body of water are not uniform and that uniformity is practicable and necessary.

(c) (1) Any entity, including, but not limited to, any county, city, port authority, district, or state agency, otherwise authorized by law to adopt measures governing the use and equipment, and matters relating thereto, of boats or vessels, may adopt emergency rules and regulations that are not in conflict with the general laws of the state relating to boats and vessels using any waters within the jurisdiction of the entity if those emergency rules and regulations are required to ensure the safety of persons and property because of disaster or other public calamity.

(2) The emergency rules and regulations adopted under paragraph (1) shall become effective immediately upon adoption and may remain in effect for not to exceed 60 days thereafter. The emergency rules and regulations shall be submitted to the department on or before their adoption.

(3) After submission of emergency rules and regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) to the department, the department may authorize the adopting entity to make the emergency rules and regulations effective for the period of time greater than 60 days that is necessary in view of the disaster or circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 501, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

661.

(a) Every owner of an undocumented vessel numbered under this code is liable and responsible for the death of or injury to person or property resulting from negligence in the operation of such vessel, in the business of the owner or otherwise, by any person using and operating the same with the permission, express or implied, of the owner, and the negligence of such person shall be imputed to the owner for all purposes of civil damage. It shall be presumed that such vessel is being operated with the knowledge and consent of the owner if at the time of the injury, death or damage it is under the control of his or her spouse, father, mother, brother, sister, son, daughter, or other immediate member of the owner’s family. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to relieve any person from any liability which he would otherwise have, but nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to authorize or permit any recovery in excess of injury or damage actually incurred.

(b) The liability of an owner for imputed negligence imposed by this section and not arising through the relationship of principal and agent or master and servant is limited to the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the death of or injury to one person in any one accident and, subject to the limit as to one person, is limited to the amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for the death of or injury to more than one person in any one accident and is limited to the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for damage to property of others in any one accident.

(c) In any action against an owner on account of imputed negligence as imposed by this section the operator of the vessel whose negligence is imputed to the owner shall be made a party defendant if personal service of process can be had upon the operator within this State. Upon recovery of judgment, recourse shall first be had against the property of the operator so served.

(d) If there is recovery under this section against an owner based on imputed negligence, the owner is subrogated to all the rights of the person injured or whose property has been injured and may recover from the operator the total amount of any judgment and costs recovered against the owner.

(e) If the bailee of an owner with the permission, expressed or implied, of the owner permits another to operate the vessel of the owner, then the bailee and such operator shall both be deemed operators of the vessel of the owner within the meaning of subdivisions (c) and (d) of this section.

(f) Where two or more persons are injured or killed in one accident, the owner may settle and pay any bona fide claims for damages arising out of personal injuries or death, whether reduced to judgment or not, and the payments shall diminish to the extent thereof the owner’s total liability on account of the accident. Payments aggregating the full sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) shall extinguish all liability of the owner for death or personal injury arising out of the accident which exists by reason of imputed negligence, pursuant to this section, and did not arise through the negligence of the owner nor through the relationship of principal and agent or master and servant.

(g) If a vessel is sold under a contract of conditional sale whereby the title to such vessel remains in the vendor, such vendor or his assignee shall not be deemed an owner within the provisions of this section relating to imputed negligence, but the vendee or his assignee shall be deemed the owner notwithstanding the terms of such contract, until the vendor or his assignee retakes possession of the vessel. A chattel mortgagee of a vessel out of possession is not an owner within the provisions of this section relating to imputed negligence.

(h) No action based on imputed negligence under this section shall abate by reason of the death of any injured person or of any person liable or responsible under the provisions of this section. In any action for physical injury based on imputed negligence under this section by the executor, administrator, or personal representative of any deceased person, the damages recoverable shall be the same as those recoverable under Section 956 of the Civil Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2132.)
-------------------------------------------

662.

A copy of the ordinances or local laws adopted pursuant to this chapter, and of any amendments thereto, shall be filed in the office of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------

663.

Every peace officer of this state or of any city, county, city and county, or other political subdivision of the state shall enforce this chapter and any regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter and in the exercise of that duty shall have the authority to stop and board any vessel subject to this chapter, where the peace officer has probable cause to believe that a violation of state law or regulations or local ordinance exists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 745, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

663.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a peace officer may, without a warrant, arrest a person who is involved in an accident in the waters of this state involving a vessel when the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person had been operating the vessel while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug, or under the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 877, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

663.5.

Within the territorial limits of a county, city, or district, a harbor policeman regularly employed and paid as such by the county, city, or district shall also enforce the provisions of this chapter and any rules or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter and the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9850) of Division 3.5 of the Vehicle Code.

In the exercise of his duties, a harbor policeman shall have the authority to stop any vessel subject to this chapter and to issue written notices to appear in court pursuant to Section 664. As used in Section 664, the term “officer” shall include a harbor policeman regularly employed and paid as such by a county, city, or district.

Every harbor policeman who is on duty for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter, and the rules and regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter, shall wear a full distinctive uniform, and, if he uses a vessel, the vessel shall be painted a distinctive color and appropriately marked as specified by the department to identify it as a harbor police vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1544.)
-------------------------------------------

663.6.

Every vessel subject to this chapter, if under way and lawfully ordered to stop and lie to by a peace officer or harbor policeman authorized to enforce the provisions of this chapter who is either in a uniform of a law enforcement agency or the harbor police or in a vessel that is distinctly marked as belonging to a law enforcement agency or to the harbor police, shall stop immediately and lie to, or shall maneuver in such a way as to permit the peace officer or harbor police vessel to come alongside.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

663.7.

(a) Each county of the state is entitled to receive state financial aid for boating safety and enforcement programs on waters under its jurisdiction as provided in this section. A boating safety and enforcement program, as used in this section, includes search and rescue operations, recovery of drowned bodies, enforcement of state and local measures for regulation of boating activities, inspection of vessels, and supervision of organized water events.

(b) A public agency within a county and the Department of Parks and Recreation are entitled to receive aid for boating safety and enforcement programs on waters under their jurisdiction through the county in which it lies, and that aid shall be counted as aid to the county; except that aid provided under subdivision (h) for boating safety and enforcement programs of the Department of Parks and Recreation for waters under its jurisdiction shall not be counted as aid to a county.

(c) (1) Of the funds appropriated for boating safety and enforcement programs pursuant to Section 85.2, the department shall adopt and utilize a formula that first allocates funds to counties so that no county receives less than the amount it was allocated in the 1996–97 fiscal year, unless the county’s program is reduced, or the county does not meet the eligibility requirements of this section. If the total amount of money in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund is less than the amount available for the 1996–97 fiscal year, the funds allocated to each county shall be reduced in proportion to the reduction in the overall fund relative to the 1996–97 fiscal year.

(2) Second, from funds remaining, the department shall allocate funds to eligible counties which have submitted a grant application pursuant to subdivision (i) but which do not receive an allocation pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not be greater in total amount than 50 percent of the funds appropriated for boating safety programs, unless the department determines that an amount greater than 50 percent is needed to meet the minimum allocation requirements set forth in paragraph (1).

(d) The amount of aid for which a county or a public agency within a county is eligible under this section shall not exceed the total cost of its boating safety and enforcement program. Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), no county shall receive an amount greater than 20 percent of the total funds appropriated to all counties for boating safety and enforcement programs in any fiscal year. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any county that receives a boating safety and enforcement allocation during the 1997–98 fiscal year as a result of a prior appropriation shall not receive an additional allocation for the 1997–98 fiscal year pursuant to this section.

(e) The department shall not allocate funds to any county or a public agency within a county unless the department receives a resolution adopted annually by the board of supervisors authorizing the county to participate in the program and certifying that the county will expend for boating safety programs during that year not less than an amount equal to 100 percent of the amount received by the county from personal property taxes on vessels. The money allocated to a county pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used only for boating safety and enforcement programs, as specified in subdivision (a), that are conducted in that county.

(f) Any county that receives an allocation of funds pursuant to subdivision (c) shall submit a report to the department on or before 60 days after the end of the fiscal year that provides all of the following:

(1) The purpose for which funds received in the immediately preceding fiscal year were spent.

(2) The total amount expended on boating safety and enforcement programs in the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(3) All pertinent boating safety and enforcement and accident statistics from the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(4) All other data that may be required by the department relating to improved boating safety in California.

(g) The department shall provide in its biennial report to the Legislature a summary of boating safety activities undertaken by the counties receiving financial aid from the department in the immediately preceding two fiscal years along with a summary of the information received pursuant to subdivision (f).

(h) Aid for boating safety and enforcement programs shall be made available to the Department of Parks and Recreation for waters under its jurisdiction in accordance with a boat entry unit cost factor derived by dividing the most recent annual boat entry count into the maximum amount available and appropriated for those programs in the 1969–70 fiscal year. Budgets for those programs shall be estimated for each fiscal year and adjustments shall be made thereto for the previous year in accordance with the actual boat entry count as it becomes available multiplied by the boat entry unit cost factor. The amount thus determined shall be available to the Department of Parks and Recreation from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(i) Entities or agencies desiring aid under this section shall submit grant applications to the department at least six months prior to the period for which aid is required. Grant applications shall be in the form and contain the information that the department may require.

(j) Within 60 days after the close of any period for which aid is received, the entity or agency shall submit to the department a statement of the expenditures actually incurred, in the form and containing the information that the department may require.

(k) The department shall be responsible for the administration of this section, and may adopt rules and regulations that may be necessary to carry out its provisions. The department shall make periodic evaluations of the effectiveness of programs receiving aid under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 971, Sec. 2.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

664.

(a) When any person is arrested for a violation of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter or any ordinance or local law relating to the operation and equipment of vessels, and that person is not immediately taken before a magistrate, the arresting officer shall prepare in duplicate a written notice to appear in court, containing the name and address of that person, the offense charged, and the time and place where and when that person shall appear in court.

(b) The time specified in the notice to appear must be at least five days after the arrest.

(c) The place specified in the notice to appear shall be any of the following:

(1) Before a superior court judge who is within the county in which the offense charged is alleged to have been committed and who is nearest and most accessible to the place where the arrest is made.

(2) Upon demand of the person arrested, before a superior court judge at the county seat of the county in which the offense is alleged to have been committed.

(3) Before an officer authorized by the county, city, or city and county, to receive a deposit of bail.

(4) Before a superior court judge within 50 miles by the nearest road to the place of the alleged offense and whose county contains any portion of the body of water upon which the offense charged is alleged to have been committed.

(d) The officer shall deliver one copy of the notice to appear to the arrested person and the arrested person in order to secure release must give a written promise so to appear in court by signing the duplicate notice which shall be retained by the officer. Thereupon the arresting officer shall forthwith release the person arrested from custody.

(e) The officer shall, as soon as practicable, file the duplicate notice with the magistrate specified therein. Thereupon the magistrate shall fix the amount of bail which in the magistrate’s judgment, in accordance with the provisions of Section 1275 of the Penal Code, will be reasonable and sufficient for the appearance of the defendant and shall indorse upon the notice a statement signed by the defendant in the form set forth in Section 815a of the Penal Code. The defendant may, prior to the date upon which the defendant promised to appear in court, deposit with the magistrate the amount of bail thus set. Thereafter, at the time when the case is called for arraignment before the magistrate, if the defendant shall not appear, either in person or by counsel, the magistrate may declare the bail forfeited, and may in the magistrate’s discretion order that no further proceedings shall be had in the case.

Upon the making of any order that no further proceedings be had, all sums deposited as bail shall forthwith be paid into the county treasury for distribution pursuant to Section 1463 of the Penal Code.

(f) No warrant shall issue on any charge for the arrest of a person who has given a written promise to appear in court, unless and until the person has violated that promise or has failed to deposit bail, to appear for arraignment, trial or judgment, or to comply with the terms and provisions of the judgment, as required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

665.

Any person willfully violating his written promise to appear in court is guilty of a misdemeanor regardless of the disposition of the charge upon which he was originally arrested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------

666.

When a person signs a written promise to appear at the time and place specified in the written promise to appear and has not posted bail as provided in Section 664, the magistrate shall issue and have delivered for execution a warrant for his arrest within twenty (20) days after his failure to appear as promised, or if such person promises to appear before an officer authorized to accept bail other than a magistrate and fails to do so on or before the date which he promised to appear, then, within twenty (20) days after the delivery of such written promise to appear by the officer to a magistrate having jurisdiction over the offense.

When such person violates his promise to appear before an officer authorized to receive bail other than a magistrate, the officer shall immediately deliver to the magistrate having jurisdiction over the offense charged the written promise to appear and the complaint, if any, filed by the arresting officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------

667.

In addition to any other court which may be a proper place of trial, any superior court location where cases of that type are tried, within 50 miles by the nearest road to the place of the alleged offense, shall be a proper place of trial of any person on a charge of violation of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter or any ordinance or local law relating to the operation and equipment of vessels if the county in which the court is located includes any portion of the body of water upon which the offense charged is alleged to have been committed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

668.

(a) Any person who violates subdivision (c) of Section 652, Section 654, 654.05, 654.06, 655.7, 658.3, 659, 673, 674, or 754, or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or any regulation adopted pursuant to Section 655.3 relating to vessel equipment requirements, is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) (1) (A) Except as provided in subdivision (a), any person who violates any regulation adopted pursuant to Section 655.3 is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than five days, or by both that fine and imprisonment, for each
 violation.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), any person who violates subdivision (b) of Section 6695 of Article 5 of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations relating to blinding lights, is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), any person who violates Section 6600.1 of Article 5 of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, by violating United States Coast Guard Navigation Rule 20, relating to navigation lights, is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) Any person who violates subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 658 is guilty of an infraction and shall be punished
 by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200) for each violation.

 (3) (A) Any person who violates subdivision (d) of Section 652, subdivision (a) of Section 655, Section 655.05, 656, or 656.1, subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 658, Section 663.6 or 665, or any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 660, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment, for each violation.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), any person who violates subdivision (a) of Section 655 by violating subdivision (a) of Section 6697 of Article 5 of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, relating to riding on the bow, gunwale, or transom of a vessel propelled by machinery is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(4) Any person who violates Section 652.5 is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(5) Any person who violates Section 655.2, or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(c) (1) Any person convicted of a violation of Section 656.2 or 656.3 shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) In imposing the minimum fine required by this subdivision, the court shall take into consideration the defendant’s ability to pay the fine and, in the interest of justice for reasons stated in the record, may reduce the amount of that minimum fine to less than the amount otherwise required by this subdivision.

(d) Any person convicted of a violation of Section 658.5 shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(e) Any person convicted of a first violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 655, or of a violation of Section 655.4, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment. If probation is granted, the court, as a condition of probation, may require the person to participate in, and successfully complete, an alcohol or drug education, training, or treatment program, in addition to imposing any penalties required by this code. In order to enable all persons to participate in licensed programs, every person referred to a program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code shall pay that program’s costs commensurate with that person’s ability to pay as determined by Section 11837.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) Any person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 655 within seven years of the first conviction of any of those subdivisions or subdivision (f) of Section 655, or any person convicted of a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 655 within seven years of a separate conviction of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, or a separate conviction of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, when the separate conviction resulted from the operation of a motor vehicle, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. If probation is granted, the court, as a condition of probation, may require the person to do either of the
 following, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment:

(1) Participate, for at least 18 months subsequent to the underlying conviction and in a manner satisfactory to the court, in a program licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 11836) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, as designated by the court. In order to enable all required persons to participate, each person shall pay the program costs commensurate with the person’s ability to pay as determined pursuant to Section 11837.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Participate, for at least 30 months subsequent to the underlying conviction and in a manner satisfactory to the court, in a program licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 11836) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code. A person ordered to treatment pursuant to this paragraph
 shall apply to the court or to a board of review, as designated by the court, at the conclusion of the program to obtain the court’s order of satisfaction. Only upon the granting of that order of satisfaction by the court may the program issue its certificate of successful completion. A failure to obtain an order of satisfaction at the conclusion of the program is a violation of probation. In order to enable all required persons to participate, each person shall pay the program costs commensurate with the person’s ability to pay as determined pursuant to Section 11837.4 of the Health and Safety Code. No condition of probation required pursuant to this paragraph is a basis for reducing any other probation requirement.

(g) Any person convicted of a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 655 shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county
 jail for not less than 90 days or more than one year, and by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). If probation is granted, the court, as a condition of probation, may require the person to participate in, and successfully complete, a program licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 11836) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the person’s county of residence or employment, as designated by the court. In order to enable all required persons to participate, each person shall pay the program costs commensurate with the person’s ability to pay as determined pursuant to Section 11837.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) (1) If any person is convicted of a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 655 within seven years of a separate conviction of a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), or
 (e) of Section 655 and is granted probation, the court shall impose as a condition of probation that the person be confined in a county jail for not less than five days or more than one year and pay a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) If any person is convicted of a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 655 within seven years of a separate conviction of a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 655, of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, or Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code, or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, when the separate conviction resulted from the operation of a
 motor vehicle, and is granted probation, the court shall impose as a condition of probation that the person be confined in a county jail for not less than 90 days or more than one year, and pay a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and the court, as a condition of probation, may order that the person participate in a manner satisfactory to the court, in a program licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 11836) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment. In order to enable all required persons to participate, each person shall pay the program costs commensurate with the person’s ability to pay as determined pursuant to Section 11837.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) The court shall not absolve a person who is convicted of a violation of subdivision (f) of Section
 655 within seven years of a separate conviction of a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655, of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, or Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code, or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, when the separate conviction resulted from the operation of a motor vehicle, from the minimum time in confinement provided in this section and a fine of at least two hundred fifty dollars ($250), except as provided in subdivision (h).

(j) Except in unusual cases where the interests of justice demand an exception, the court shall not strike a separate conviction of an offense under subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655
 or of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, or Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code, or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, when the separate conviction resulted from the operation of a motor vehicle, for purposes of sentencing in order to avoid imposing, as part of the sentence or as a term of probation, the minimum time in confinement and the minimum fine, as provided in this section. When a separate conviction is stricken by the court for purposes of sentencing, the court shall specify the reason or reasons for the striking order. On appeal by the people from an order striking a separate conviction, it shall be conclusively presumed that the order was made only for the reasons specified in the order, and the order shall be reversed if there is no substantial basis in the
 record for any of those reasons.

(k) A person who flees the scene of the crime after committing a violation of subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code shall be subject to subdivision (c) of Section 20001 of the Vehicle Code.

(l) Any person who violates Section 654.3 is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each separate violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 67, Sec. 3.   (SB 1162)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

668.1.

(a) A person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655, or of Section 655.2, 655.6, 655.7, 658, or 658.5, or of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 681, or of Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, or of the federal rules of the road and pilot rules, not including equipment requirements, incorporated by reference in Section 6600.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, or found by a court to have performed any of the acts described in Section 6697 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, pertaining to a mechanically propelled vessel but not to manipulating any water skis, an aquaplane, or similar device, when the conviction resulted from the operation of a vessel, shall be ordered by the court to
 complete and pass a boating safety course approved by the department pursuant to Section 668.3.

(b) A person who has been ordered by the court to complete and pass a boating safety course pursuant to this section shall submit to the court proof of completion and passage of the course within seven months of the time of his or her conviction. The proof shall be in a form that has been approved by the department and that provides for the ability to submit the form to the court through the United States Postal Service. If the person who has been required to complete and pass a boating safety course is under 18 years of age, the court may require that the person obtain parental consent to enroll in the course. If the person does not complete and pass the boating safety course, the court may extend the period for completion or impose another penalty as prescribed by statute.

(c) The